Georgia, session 2025_26, HB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use tax, is amended by revising subparagraph (A) of paragraph (68.1) as follows:
"(68.1)(A) For the period commencing on July 1, 2018, and ending on December 31,
2031 2026, high-technology data center equipment to be incorporated or used in a
high-technology data center that meets the high-technology data center minimum
investment threshold and other conditions provided in this paragraph."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 559
- 1 -